Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2543XS (3) 91 as/js S.F. 328 Section 1. Section 124.204, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . cq. 2-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4- 3 yl)-N-phenylbutanamide. Other name: alphaâ-Methyl butyryl 4 fentanyl. 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . cr. N-(1-(2,5- 6 dimethoxyphenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpropionamide. Other 7 name: 2â,5â-Dimethoxyfentanyl. 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . cs. N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N- 9 phenylfuran-3-carboxamide. Other name: 3-Furanyl fentanyl. 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . ct. 3-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4- 11 yl)-N-phenylbutanamide. Other name: Isovaleryl fentanyl. 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . cu. N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1- 13 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide. Other name: meta- 14 Fluorofentanyl. 15 NEW PARAGRAPH . cv. N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1- 16 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide. Other name: meta- 17 Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl. 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . cw. N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1- 19 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide. Other name: 20 ortho-Fluorofuranyl fentanyl. 21 NEW PARAGRAPH . cx. N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1- 22 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide. Other name: 23 para-Methoxyfuranyl fentanyl. 24 NEW PARAGRAPH . cy. N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1- 25 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide. Other name: 26 para-Methylcyclopropyl fentanyl. 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . cz. 1-(2-methyl-4-(3-phenylprop-2-en-1- 28 yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1-one. Other name: 2-Methyl AP-237. 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . da. 2-(2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-1H- 30 benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine. Other names: 31 etodesnitazene; etazene. 32 NEW PARAGRAPH . db. 2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2- 33 (pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole. Other names: N- 34 pyrrolidino etonitazene; etonitazepyne. 35 -1- LSB 2543XS (3) 91 as/js 1/ 6 S.F. 328 NEW PARAGRAPH . dc. N,N-diethyl-2-(5-nitro-2-(4- 1 propoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine. Other name: 2 protonitazene. 3 Sec. 2. Section 124.204, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 4 by adding the following new paragraphs: 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . cn. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1- 6 oxobutan-2-yl)-1-butyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide. Other name: 7 ADB-BUTINACA. 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . co. 4-methyl-1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1- 9 yl)pentan-1-one. Other name: alpha-PiHP. 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . cp. 2-(methylamino)-1-(3- 11 methylphenyl)propan-1-one. Other names: 3-MMC; 3- 12 methylmethcathinone. 13 Sec. 3. Section 124.204, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended 14 by adding the following new paragraphs: 15 NEW PARAGRAPH . o. Methyl 3,3-dimethyl-2-(1-(pent-4-en- 16 1-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)butanoate. Other name: 17 MDMB-4en-PINACA. 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . p. Methyl 2-[[1-(4-fluorobutyl)indole- 19 3-carbonyl]amino]-3,3-dimethyl-butanoate. Other names: 20 4F-MDMB-BUTICA; 4F-MDMB-BICA. 21 NEW PARAGRAPH . q. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan- 22 2-yl)-1-(pent-4-en-1-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide. Other 23 name: ADB-4en-PINACA. 24 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. 5-Pentyl-2-(2-phenylpropan-2- 25 yl)pyrido[4,3-b]indol-1-one. Other names: CUMYL-PEGACLONE; 26 SGT-151. 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . s. Ethyl 2-[[1-(5-fluoropentyl)indole- 28 3-carbonyl]amino]-3,3-dimethyl-butanoate. Other names: 29 5F-EDMB-PICA; 5F-EDMB-2201. 30 NEW PARAGRAPH . t. Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H- 31 indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methyl butanoate. Other name: MMB- 32 FUBICA. 33 NEW PARAGRAPH . u. N-ethyl-2-(2-(4-isopropoxybenzyl)-5- 34 nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine, its isomers, esters, 35 -2- LSB 2543XS (3) 91 as/js 2/ 6 S.F. 328 ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers. Other 1 name: N-desethyl isotonitazene. 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. 2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2- 3 piperidin-1-yl)-1H-benzimidazole, its isomers, esters, ethers, 4 salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers. Other names: 5 N-piperidinyl etonitazene; etonitazepipne. 6 Sec. 4. Section 124.204, subsection 9, paragraphs d, h, and 7 i, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs. 8 Sec. 5. Section 124.208, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 9 by adding the following new paragraphs: 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . bm. 5[alpha]-androstan-3,6,17-trione. 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . bn. 6-bromo-androsta-1,4-diene-3,17- 12 dione. 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . bo. 6-bromo-androstan-3,17-dione. 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . bp. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-androsta- 15 1,4-diene-3,17[beta]-diol. 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . bq. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-androst- 17 4-ene-3[beta],17[beta]-diol. 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . br. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 19 hydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one. 20 NEW PARAGRAPH . bs. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 21 hydroxy-androst-4-ene-3,11-dione. 22 NEW PARAGRAPH . bt. 2[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl- 23 17[beta]-hydroxy-5[beta]-androstan-3-one. 24 NEW PARAGRAPH . bu. 2[alpha],3[alpha]-epithio- 25 17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]-androstan-17[beta]-ol. 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . bv. estra-4,9,11-triene-3,17-dione. 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . bw. [3,2-c]furazan-5[alpha]-androstan- 28 17[beta]-ol. 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . bx. 18a-homo-3-hydroxy-estra-2,5(10)- 30 dien-17-one. 31 NEW PARAGRAPH . by. 4-hydroxy-androst-4-ene-3,17-dione. 32 NEW PARAGRAPH . bz. 17[beta]-hydroxy-androstano[2,3- 33 d]isoxazole. 34 NEW PARAGRAPH . ca. 17[beta]-hydroxy-androstano[3,2- 35 -3- LSB 2543XS (3) 91 as/js 3/ 6 S.F. 328 c]isoxazole. 1 NEW PARAGRAPH . cb. 3[beta]-hydroxy-estra-4,9,11-trien- 2 17-one. 3 NEW PARAGRAPH . cc. 17[alpha]-methyl-androsta-1,4- 4 diene-3,17[beta]-diol. 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . cd. 17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]- 6 androstan-17[beta]-ol. 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . ce. 17[alpha]-methyl-androstan-3- 8 hydroxyimine-17[beta]-ol. 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . cf. 6[alpha]-methyl-androst-4-ene-3,17- 10 dione. 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . cg. 17[alpha]-methyl-androst-2-ene- 12 3,17[beta]-diol. 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . ch. [3,2-c]pyrazole-androst-4-en- 14 17[beta]-ol. 15 Sec. 6. Section 124.208, subsection 6, paragraphs a, h, v, 16 z, aa, am, ay, ba, bb, bc, bk, and bl, Code 2025, are amended 17 by striking the paragraphs and inserting in lieu thereof the 18 following: 19 a. 3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androstane. 20 h. 1-androstenedione (5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione). 21 v. Furazabol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 22 hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]furazan). 23 z. Mestanolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]- 24 androstan-3-one). 25 aa. Mesterolone (1[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]- 26 androstan-3-one). 27 am. 17[alpha]-methyl-[Delta]1-dihydrotestosterone 28 (17[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one) 29 (also known as 17-[alpha]-methyl-1-testosterone). 30 ay. Oxandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-2-oxa- 31 5[alpha]-androstan-3-one). 32 ba. Oxymetholone (17[alpha]-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene- 33 17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstan-3-one). 34 bb. Stanozolol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha] 35 -4- LSB 2543XS (3) 91 as/js 4/ 6 S.F. 328 -androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole). 1 bc. Stenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2-methyl-5[alpha]-androst- 2 1-en-3-one). 3 bk. Methasterone (2[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl-5[alpha] 4 -androstan-17[beta]-ol-3-one or 2[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl- 5 17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstan-3-one). 6 bl. Prostanozol (17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstano[3,2- 7 c]pyrazole or [3,2-c]pyrazole-5[alpha]-androstan-17[beta]-ol). 8 Sec. 7. Section 124.210, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 9 by adding the following new paragraph: 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . bh. Zuranolone. 11 Sec. 8. Section 124.212, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. Other substances. Unless specifically 14 excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, 15 compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of 16 the following substances: 17 a. (5Z)-7-[(1R,2R,3R)-3-hydroxy-2-[(1E,3S)-3-hydroxyoct-1- 18 en-1-yl]-5-oxocyclopentyl]hept-5-enoic acid. 19 b. (5Z,13E,15S)-9 Î± ,11 Î± ,15-trihydroxyprosta-5,13-dien-1-oic 20 acid. 21 Sec. 9. Section 124B.2, subsection 1, paragraphs y and ad, 22 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 23 y. Iodine in concentrations greater than 2.2 percent . 24 ad. N-phenylpiperidin-4-amine(4-anilinopiperidine; 25 N-phenyl-4-piperidinamine; 4-AP), its amides, its carbamates, 26 and its halides, its salts , and any combination thereof, 27 whenever the existence of such is possible . 28 Sec. 10. Section 124B.6, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 29 following new subsection: 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. A sale, transfer, furnishing, or 31 receipt of a chemical mixture identified as exempt by federal 32 regulation. 33 Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of 34 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 35 -5- LSB 2543XS (3) 91 as/js 5/ 6 S.F. 328